en: Puy lentils
fr: lentilles vertes du Puy, lentilles vertes du Puy AOP
hu: Puy lencse
la: lens culinaris puyensis

en: cooked green lentils
de: grüne Linsen gekocht
fi: kypsennetty vihreä linssi, kypsennetyt vihreät linssit
fr: lentilles vertes cuites
hr: kuhana zelena leća
it: lenticchie verdi cotte
nl: gekookte groene linzen

en: yellow lentils
fr: lentilles jaunes
hu: sárga lencse

en: red lentils
bg: червена леща
cs: červená čočka
de: Rote Linsen
es: lentejas rojas
fi: punainen linssi, punaiset linssit
fr: lentilles corail, lentilles rouges, lentilles corail rouge
hr: leća svijetlo crvena, leća tamnocrvena, leća crvena
hu: vöröslencse
it: lenticchie rosse
ja: 赤レンズ豆
nl: rode linzen
pl: soczewica czerwona, soczewicy czerwonej
sv: röda linser

en: green and red lentils
de: grüne und rote Linsen
fi: vihreät ja punaiset linssit
hr: zelena i crvena leća
it: lenticchie verdi e rosse
sv: gröna och röda linser

en: organic red lentils
fi: punainen luomulinssi, punaiset luomulinssit
fr: lentilles corail issues de l'agriculture biologique
hr: organska crvena leća
it: lenticchie rosse biologiche

en: black lentils
cs: černá čočka
fr: lentilles noires
hr: crna leća
hu: fekete lencse
it: lenticchie nere
pl: soczewica czarna, soczewicy czarnej, czarna soczewica, czarnej soczewicy

en: Beluga lentils
cs: Beluga čočka
de: Beluga Linsen, Belugalinsen
fr: lentilles noires Beluga, lentilles Béluga
hr: beluga leća
hu: beluga lencse
it: lenticchie beluga
pl: soczewica Beluga, soczewica czarna Beluga

en: black lentil flour
fr: farine de lentilles noires
hr: brašno od crne leće
it: farina di lenticchie nere
pl: mąka z soczewicy czarnej, mąka z czarnej soczewicy

en: brown lentils
cs: hnědá čočka
de: braune Linsen
fr: lentilles brunes
hr: smeđa leća
hu: barna lencse
it: lenticchie marroni
pl: soczewica brązowa

en: pardina lentils
de: Pardina Linsen
es: lenteja pardina
fr: lentilles pardina
hr: pardina leća
it: lenticchie pardina
pt: lentilhas pardina

en: red lentil flour
de: rotes Linsenmehl, Rotelinsenmehl
fr: farine de lentilles corail
hr: brašno od crvene leće
it: farina di lenticchie rosse
pl: mąka z czerwonej soczewicy, mąka z soczewicy czerwonej

en: sprouted lentils
de: gekeimte Linsen, gekeimte Linsensamen, Linsensprossen
fr: lentilles germées
hr: proklijala leća
it: lenticchie germogliate
pl: kiełki soczewicy

en: lentil flour
bg: брашно от леща
ca: farina de llentia
cs: čočková mouka
de: Linsenmehl
es: harina de lenteja
fi: linssijauho
fr: farine de lentilles
hr: brašno od leće
it: farina di lenticchie
nl: linsenmeel
sv: linsmjöl

en: wholemeal lentil flour
ca: farina integral de llentia
de: Linsenvollkornmehl
es: harina integral de lenteja
hr: integralno brašno od leće
it: farina integrale di lenticchie

en: lentil protein
cs: čočkový protein, čočková bílkovina
da: linseprotein
fi: linssiproteiinia
sv: linsprotein

en: lentil protein preparation
cs: přípravek z čočkové bílkoviny
da: linseproteinpræparat
fi: linssiproteiinivalmiste
sv: beredning av linsprotein

en: nut, nuts, mixed nuts, other nuts
af: neut
an: Nuez
ar: بندقة
ba: Сәтләүек
be: арэхі
bg: ядки
bn: বাদাম
br: kraoñ
bs: orašasti plod
ca: nou
ce: БӀар
cs: oříšek, skořápkové plody, jiné skořápkové plody
cv: Мăйăр
cy: Cneuen
da: nød, nødder
de: Nüssen, Nusskernmischung, Nussfrucht, Nußfrucht, Schalenfrüchte, Nüsse, Schalenfrüchten, andere Nüsse, anderen Nüssen, andere Schalenfrüchte, andere Schalenfrüchten, anderen Schalenfrüchte, anderen Schalenfrüchten, anderer Schalenfrüchte, anderer Schalenfrüchten, Nuss
el: Κάρυο, καρποί με κέλυφος, καρύδια
eo: nukso
es: frutos secos, frutos de cáscara, frutos con cáscara, frutos secos de cáscara, otros frutos secos de cáscara, otros frutos de cáscara, frutos de cáscara y derivados, otros nueces
et: pähkel, pähklid
eu: fruitu oskoldun
fa: فندقی
fi: pähkinä, pähkinät, muut pähkinät
fo: nøt
fr: fruits à coque, fruit à coque, fruits à coques, autres fruits à coque, fruits secs à coque, fruits à coque dure
fy: nút
ga: Cnó, cnónna
gd: cnò
gl: noz
gn: Yvapo
gv: cro
he: אגוז
hi: अखरोट
hr: orah, orašasto voće, orašaste plodove
ht: Nwa
hu: diófélék, dióféléket, diofeleket
hy: ընկույզ
ia: nuce
id: kacang pohon
is: hneta
it: frutta a guscio, altra frutta a guscio
ja: 種実, 種実類, 木の実, 木の実類
ka: კაკალი
kk: Жаңғақтар
ko: 견과
la: Nux
li: noot
lo: ແຫ້ງເປືອກ
lt: Riešutas, riešutai
lv: rieksts, rieksti, riekstu
mg: vadin-tsaikiro
mk: оревест плод
ml: അണ്ടി
ms: kekeras
mt: ġewża, ġewż
my: အခွံမာသီး
nb: nøtt
nl: noot, noten
nn: nøtt
oc: nòse
or: ବାଦାମ
pa: ਗਿਰੀ
pl: orzech, orzechy, inne orzechy
pt: nozes, frutos de casca rija
ro: nuci, fructe cu coajă lemnoasă, alte fructe cu coajă lemnoasă
ru: орех, орехи, орехов
se: Niehtit
sh: orašasti plod
sk: oriešok, orechy, iné orechy
sl: orešek, oreški, orehi
so: miro
sq: bajame
sr: орашасти плодови
sv: nöt, nötter
sw: Jozi
ta: கொட்டை
te: గింజ
tg: Чормағз
th: ลูก
tl: mani
tr: kuru yemiş
tt: чикләвек
uk: горіх
ur: مغز
uz: Yongʻoq
vi: Hạch
yi: נוס
zh: 坚果

en: tree nut, treenuts, tree nuts
cs: Ořechy
de: Baumnüsse, Baumnuss
es: nueces de árboles
hr: orašasti plodovi
it: noci da alberi, noci d'albero, noce d'albero
ja: ナッツ
lv: koku rieksts
nb: trenøtt, trenøtter
nl: boomnoten
pt: Árvore de frutos secos

en: almond, almonds, almond kernel, mamra giri, badaam giri, Raw almond kernels
am: አልመንድ
ar: لوز
bg: бадем, бадеми
ca: ametlla, ametlles
cs: mandle, madle
da: mandel, mandler
de: Mandel, Mandeln
el: Αμύγδαλο, αμύγδαλα, Αμυγδαλόψιχα
eo: migdalo
es: almendra, almendras
et: Mandel, mandlid, mandleid
eu: Arbendol
fi: manteli, mantelit, mantelia
fr: amande, amandes
fy: Mangel
ga: almóinní
gl: Améndoa
he: שקד
hr: badem, bademi, badema
hu: mandula
ia: amandola
is: möndlu
it: mandorla, mandorle
ja: アーモンド
la: Prunis dulcis
lt: migdolai, migdolų
lv: mandeles
mt: lewż
nb: mandel, mandler
nl: amandel, amandelen, krokante amandelen, bruine amandelen, bruine amandel
oc: Almendra
pl: migdały, orzechy migdałowe, migdał, migdałów
pt: amêndoa, amêndoas
ro: migdale
ru: миндаль
sk: Mandľa, mandle
sl: mandlji
sq: Bajamet
sv: mandel, mandlar
th: อัลมอนด์
tr: badem
tt: бәдәм җимеше
za: Makgai